dictionaries/ru-ru.dic
ÜËÚÁÌØÔÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÛÉÒÉÔØ/LPW
ÛÅÐÔÁÔØÓÑ/LY
ÚÁÞÅÓÔØ/LY
ÚÁÝÅÍÉÔØ/BLRW
ÚÁÛÅÐÔÁÔØ/LRY
ÚÁÛÁÒÐÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÚÁ×ÅÓÔÉÓØ/LY
ÚÁÖÍÕÒÉÔØ/LRTW
ÚÁÔÒÁ×ÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÚÁÔÉÒÁÎÉÔØ/LRW
ÚÁÓÍÏÌÉÔØ/BLRW
ÚÁÓÌÁÔØ/LRY
ÚÁÓÅÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÚÁÐÕÄÒÉÔØ/BLRW
ÚÁÐÒÏÐÁÓÔØ/LRY
ÚÁÏÓÔÒÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÚÁÎÁ×ÅÓÉÔØÓÑ/LRTW
ÚÁÍÑÔØ/LRY
ÚÁÌÏÍÉÔØ/BLRW
ÚÁËÒÕÇÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÚÁËÏÌÏÔÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÚÁÉÍÓÔ×Ï×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÚÁÈÒÁÐÅÔØ/LRTY
ÚÁÇÏÓÔÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÚÁÄÁÔØÓÑ/BLRY
ÚÁÃÉËÌÉÔØ/BLRW
×ÚßÅÒÅÐÅÎÉÔØ/LRW
×Ú×ÏÌÎÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AESX
×ÚÌÅÚÔØ/LY
×ÚÂÅÌÅÎÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
×ÙÔ×ÅÒÄÉÔØ/LRW
×ÙÓÏËÏÎÒÁ×ÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
×ÙÓÅÒÅÂÒÉÔØ/LRW
×ÙÒÅÚÁÔØ/BLMPRY
×ÙÐÏÌÎÉÔØ/BLRW
×ÙÍÙÛÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
×ÙÌÉÚÁÔØ/LRY
×ÙËÕÒÉÔØ/BLRW
×ÙÇÌÁÄÉÔØ/BLRW
×ÙÂÙÔØ/LRY
×ÔÀÒÉÔØÓÑ/LRTW
×ÓÍÏÔÒÅÔØÓÑ/LRTY
×ÒÁÚÕÍÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
×ÏÚÚ×ÁÔØ/LRY
×ÏÚ×ÙÛÅÎÎÙÊ/AESX
×ÏÚÌÏÖÉÔØ/BLRW
×ÏÓÈÉÝÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
×ÏÒ×ÁÔØÓÑ/LRY
×ÏÒÏÖÉÔØ/BLPW
×ÏÏÄÕÛÅ×Ì£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
×ÍÅÓÔÉÔØ/BLRW
×ÅÓÔÉ/LY
×ÄÏÌÂÉÔØ/BLRW
ÖÉÚÎÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÕÞÉÎÉÔØ/BLRW
Õ×ÉÄÅÔØ/LRY
ÕÔÏÞÎÉÔØ/BLRW
ÕÔÏÎÞÅÎÎÙÊ/AXASX
ÕÓÔÏÒÏÖÉÔØ/LRW
ÕÓÉÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÕÒ×ÁÔØ/LRY
ÕÐÒÑÍÉÔØÓÑ/LPTW
ÕÐÒÏÝ£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÕÍÙÛÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÕÍÏÌÉÔØ/LRW
ÕËÒÕÐÎÉÔØ/BLRW
ÕÈÉÝÒÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÕÇÏÒÅÔØ/LRTY
ÕÇÁÓÉÔØ/BLRW
ÕÄ×ÏÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÕÄÉ×Ì£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÕÄÁÌÉÔØ/BLRW
ÔÒÅÎÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÔÒÁ×ÉÔØ/BLPW
ÔÏÐÔÁÔØÓÑ/LY
ÔÅÁÔÒÁÌÉÚÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÔÁÒÁÝÉÔØ/BLPW
Ó×ÑÚÁÔØ/LRY
Ó×ÅÒÈÉÚÙÓËÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
Ó×ÁÒÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÓÔÒÏÉÔØ/LPTW
ÓÒÅÚÁÔØÓÑ/LMPRY
ÓÒÁÚÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÓÐÏÎÔÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÓÐÁÓÔØ/LRY
ÓÏÝÕÒÉÔØÓÑ/LRTW
ÓÏ×ÒÅÍÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÓÏÒ×ÁÔØÓÑ/LRY
ÓÏËÒÁÝÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÓÏÉÚ×ÏÌÉÔØ/LRTW
ÓÍÕÝ£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÓÍÏÒÉÔØ/BLRW
ÓÌÙÔØ/LY
ÓÌÏÖ£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÓÌÅÐÉÔØ/BLPRW
ÓËÏÒÞÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÓÈÌÏÐÏÔÁÔØ/LRY
ÓÇÒÕÄÉÔØÓÑ/LRTW
ÓÄÅÒÖÁÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÓÂÏÌÔÉÔØ/LRW
ÓÁÍÏÓÏÇÌÁÓÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
Ò×ÁÔØÓÑ/LY
ÒÏÄÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÒÅÄÕÃÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÒÁÚ×ÅÓÔÉ/LY
ÒÁÚ×ÅÓÅÌÉÔØ/BLRW
ÒÁÚÒÏÚÎÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÒÁÚÏÒÉÔØ/BLRW
ÒÁÚÌÅÔÅÔØÓÑ/LRTY
ÒÁÚÇÒÕÚÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÒÁÚÄÒÁÖÅÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÒÁÓÞÉÓÔÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÒÁÓÔÏÐÔÁÔØ/LRY
ÒÁÓÔÉÔØ/BLPW
ÒÁÓÔÅÒÚÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÒÁÓÐÒÏÓÔÒÁÎÉÔØ/BLRW
ÒÁÓÐÌÑÓÁÔØÓÑ/LRY
ÒÁÓËÒÏÛÉÔØ/BLRW
ÒÁÓËÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÐÙÈÔÅÔØ/LTY
ÐÒÏÞÕ×ÓÔ×Ï×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÒÏÚ×ÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÒÏ×ÏÝÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÒÏÓ×ÅÝ£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÒÏÓÐÁÔØÓÑ/LRY
ÐÒÏÓÌÅÄÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÒÏÒÙÓËÁÔØ/LMRY
ÐÒÏÐÉÓÁÔØÓÑ/LRTY
ÐÒÏÌÅÔÅÔØ/LRTY
ÐÒÏÉÚ×ÏÄÉÔØÓÑ/BLPW
ÐÒÏÇÒÅÓÔÉ/Y
ÐÒÏÄÁÔØ/BLRY
ÐÒÉÚÎÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÒÉ×ÒÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÒÉ×ÅÓÉÔØ/LRTW
ÐÒÉÓÍÏÔÒÅÔØ/LRTY
ÐÒÉÐÕÛÉÔØ/LRW
ÐÒÉÐÉÓÁÔØ/LRTY
ÐÒÉÌÉÚÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÒÉËÏÎÞÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÒÉÇÎÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÒÅÔÅÒÐÅÔØ/LRTY
ÐÒÅÓÓÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÒÅËÌÏÎÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÒÅÄÐÉÓÁÔØ/LRTY
ÐÏÛÅÐÔÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÏ×ÒÅÄÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÐÏÖÒÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÏÖÉÚÎÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÐÏÓÔÕÐÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÏÓÒÅÄÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÐÏÓÍÏÔÒÅÔØÓÑ/LRTY
ÐÏÒÁÓÔÉ/Y
ÐÏÐÏÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÏÐÌÅÓËÁÔØ/LMRY
ÐÏÎÁÂÒÁÔØÓÑ/LRY
ÐÏÌÏÓËÁÔØ/BLMY
ÐÏÌÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÏÌÅÐÉÔØ/LRW
ÐÏÈÒÕÓÔÅÔØ/LRY
ÐÏÇÏÒÑÞÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÐÏÇÎÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÏÄÓÍÏÔÒÅÔØ/LRTY
ÐÏÄÓÁÈÁÒÉÔØ/LRW
ÐÏÄÐÌÙÔØ/LRY
ÐÏÄÌÅÔÅÔØ/LRTY
ÐÏÄÇÒÕÚÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÏÄÁ×ÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÐÏÂÅÖÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÅÒÅÞÅÓÔØ/LY
ÐÅÒÅÚÁÇÒÕÚÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÅÒÅ×ÅÒÔÅÔØ/LRY
ÐÅÒÅÓËÁÚÁÔØ/LRY
ÐÅÒÅÒÁÓÐÒÅÄÅÌÉÔØ/BLRW
ÐÅÒÅÐÌÙÔØ/LRY
ÐÅÒÅËÏÓÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÐÅÒÅÉÚÄÁÔØ/BLRY
ÐÅÒÅÂÒÁÔØÓÑ/LRY
ÏÞÁÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÝÅÒÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÏÖÅÓÔÏÞ£ÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÏÔ×ÅÓÔÉ/LY
ÏÔÔÒÕÂÉÔØ/LRW
ÏÔÒÁÖÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÔÐÏÌÏÓËÁÔØ/BLMRY
ÏÔÏÐÔÁÔØ/LRY
ÏÔÍÅÔÉÔØ/LRTW
ÏÔÂÒÏÄÉÔØ/LRW
ÏÔÂÅÖÁÔØ/LRY
ÏÓÍÙÓÌÅÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÏÒÏÓÉÔØ/BLRW
ÏÐÏÓÒÅÄÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÐÌÁËÁÔØ/LRY
ÏËÏÞÕÒÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÏÄÕÈÏÔ×ÏÒÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÂßÅÄÉÎÉÔØ/BLRW
ÏÂ×ÑÚÁÔØ/LRY
ÏÂÕÚÄÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÂÑÚÁÔØ/LRY
ÏÂÏÓÔÒ£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÂÏÇÁÔÉÔØ/BLRW
ÏÂÌÕÐÌÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÏÂÌÅÔÅÔØ/LRTY
ÏÂÅÚÏÒÕÖÉÔØ/LRTW
ÏÂÅÓÐÅÞÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÎÏÒÍÁÌÉÚÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÎÅÞÁÑÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅ×Ú×ÉÄÅÔØ/LY
ÎÅ×ÉÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÎÅÕÍÙÛÌÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÔÒÁÄÉÃÉÏÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÓÏ×ÅÒÛÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÐÒÏ×ÅÒÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÐÒÉËÏÓÎÏ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÏÖÉÄÁÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÎÅÏÐÒÅÄÅÌ£ÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÎÅÏÂÏÓÎÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÌÁËÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÄÕÒÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÅÁÄÁÐÔÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÎÁÚ×ÁÔØ/LRY
ÎÁ×ÏÓÔÒÉÔØ/BLRW
ÎÁÓÔÅÌÉÔØ/LRY
ÎÁÓÅÌ£ÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÎÁÒÅÚÁÔØ/BLMPY
ÎÁÐÒÕÖÉÎÉÔØÓÑ/LRW
ÎÁÐÁÈÁÔØ/LRY
ÎÁËÒÁÓÔØ/LRY
ÎÁËÏÒÍÉÔØ/BLRW
ÎÁÄÕÍÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÎÁÄÐÉÓÁÔØ/LRTY
ÍÙÌÉÔØÓÑ/LPTW
ÍÑÔØ/LY
ÍÏÇÕÝÅÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÍÅÄÌÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÍÁÌÏÎÁÓÅÌÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÌÏÖÉÔØÓÑ/BLPW
ÌÉÚÁÔØ/LY
ÌÁËÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ËÏÒÏÂÉÔØ/LPW
ËÏÌÙÈÁÔØ/BLMPY
ËÁÞÅÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÉÚ×ÉÎÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÉÚ×ÅÒÔÅÔØÓÑ/LRY
ÉÚÕÍÌÅÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÉÚÎÏÛÅÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÉÚÄÁÔØ/BLRY
ÉÓÔÒ£ÐÁÎÎÙÊ/ASX
ÉÓÓÕÛÉÔØ/LRW
ÉÓËÕÓÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÉÓÈÌÏÐÏÔÁÔØ/LRY
ÈÕÄÏÖÅÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÇÒÕÓÔÉÔØ/BLPW
ÇÏÒÅÔØ/LTY
ÆÉÌÉÇÒÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÄÕÛÉÔØÓÑ/BLPW
ÄÒÁÇÏÃÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÄÏ×ÚÙÓËÁÔØ/LRY
ÄÏÓËÁÚÁÔØ/LRY
ÄÏÐÌÅÓÔÉÓØ/LY
ÄÏÌÅÞÉÔØÓÑ/BLRW
ÄÏÇÒÅÓÔÉ/Y
ÄÉÐÌÏÍÉÒÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÃÉ×ÉÌÉÚÏ×ÁÎÎÙÊ/AESX
ÃÁÒÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÂÙÔØ/LY
ÂÏÒÏÎÉÔØ/LPW
ÂÌÁÖÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
ÂÅÚÙÓËÕÓÓÔ×ÅÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÂÅÚÄÏÎÎÙÊ/AX
ÂÅÓÆÏÒÍÅÎÎÙÊ/AEX
